Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 3. Liquidation

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d Banks §§ 758 to 769.

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 127 to 129.

§ 13-4-301.
Notice to state banking commissioner.

No receiver shall be appointed by any court nor shall any assignment for the benefit of creditors be filed in any court within this state for any bank doing business under the laws of this state without notice to the state banking commissioner unless the court finds it necessary to preserve the assets of the bank. The state banking commissioner may take possession of the bank within five (5) days after the service of notice upon him and further proceedings shall cease. The state banking commissioner shall administer the assets of the bank as provided in this act.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 99; R.S. 1931, § 10-520; C.S. 1945, § 35-531; W.S. 1957, § 13-157; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the last sentence, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

Jurisdiction of courts. —

District courts had no jurisdiction to authorize state examiner (now commissioner) to borrow money from the reconstruction finance corporation for payment of dividends to depositors. State ex rel. Richmond v. District Court, 45 Wyo. 29, 14 P.2d 673,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1932).

§ 13-4-302.
Federal deposit insurance corporation as receiver, liquidator or subrogee.

The state banking commissioner may designate the federal deposit insurance corporation to act without bond as receiver or liquidator of any bank whose deposits are insured by the corporation and which has been closed for the purpose of liquidation without adequate provision being made for the payment of its depositors. The corporation may exercise all the powers of the state banking commissioner in connection with the liquidation of banks.

If any bank closes and the federal deposit insurance corporation pays the insured deposit liabilities of the bank, the corporation is subrogated to all rights against the closed bank of each owner of a claim for deposit to the extent necessary to enable the federal deposit insurance corporation, under federal law, to make insurance payments available to depositors of closed insured banks. The subrogation is limited to the amount paid to each depositor by the federal deposit insurance corporation.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-158; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-4-303.
When bank taken possession of; resumption of business.

After taking possession of any bank, the state banking commissioner shall record a certificate that the bank has been taken over by him with the county clerk of the county in which the bank is located. The certificate is notice that the state banking commissioner has authority to exercise all the powers given him by this act. The state banking commissioner shall record a like certificate in each county in which the bank owns any interest in property. The state banking commissioner shall immediately give written notice to anyone holding assets of the bank.

No one knowing that the state banking commissioner has taken possession of the bank shall have a lien or charge for any liability subsequently incurred against any of the assets of the bank.

The bank may resume business upon such conditions as may be approved by the state banking commissioner. In case of a resumption of business a written notice of the resumption shall be recorded with the same parties with whom notice of taking over was filed and shall act as an absolute release of the first notice and all rights under it.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 90; R.S. 1931, § 10-511; C.S. 1945, § 35-516; W.S. 1957, § 13-142; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence in subsection (a), see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-4-304.
Application by bank for injunction.

If any bank deems itself aggrieved by the state banking commissioner taking possession of the bank, it may within ten (10) days after the takeover apply to the district court of the judicial district in which the office of the bank was located to enjoin further proceedings. The court may dismiss the application or enjoin the state banking commissioner from further proceedings and direct him to surrender the business and property to the bank.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 98; R.S. 1931, § 10-519; C.S. 1945, § 35-530; W.S. 1957, § 13-156; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-4-305.
Appointment of deputy examiners.

The state banking commissioner may appoint special deputy state banking commissioners as agents to assist him in the duty of liquidation and distribution. A certificate of appointment shall be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the bank was located. The state banking commissioner may require surety for the faithful discharge of their duties.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 91; R.S. 1931, § 10-512; C.S. 1945, § 35-517; W.S. 1957, § 13-143; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-4-306.
When bank permitted to continue business.

If the state banking commissioner discovers upon taking possession of a bank that the bank is only temporarily embarrassed for want of available funds and that the bank’s assets are sufficient to pay its liabilities leaving its capital unimpaired, or if the stockholders of the bank make good its capital, he may permit the officers and directors of the bank to arrange with the depositors and creditors for resumption of business by the bank.

The bank when permitted to continue business shall pay all expenses of the state banking commissioner in taking charge of the bank and looking after its affairs while under his control including a per diem of ten dollars ($10.00).

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 107; R.S. 1931, § 10-528; C.S. 1945, § 35-542; W.S. 1957, § 13-169; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 2001, ch. 156, § 2.